Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-604
Telegraph companies and press associations; statement; failure to register; penalty.

Every telegraph company, and press association or corporation engaged in the transmission, collection, and delivery of telegraph dispatches, that refuses or fails to comply with section 86-602 shall forfeit its right to carry on the collection, transmission, and delivery of dispatches for publication or for private use and shall forfeit to the county where such business is conducted one thousand dollars for each violation of sections 86-601 to 86-603. Each day a violation continues constitutes a separate violation. The county attorney shall prosecute such violations at the expense of the county where the violations occurred.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 4, p. 322;

R.S.1913, § 7398;

C.S.1922, § 7073;

C.S.1929, § 86-104;

R.S.1943, § 86-104;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-104;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 366.